Wisconsin, session 2025, AB907.
do enact as follows:AB907,11Section 1. 565.27 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes is repealed.AB907,22Section 2. 565.27 (2) (b) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB907,2,53565.27 (2) (b) 1m. The drawings shall be random selections of the winning 4results. The department may employ mechanical, electrical, or computerized 5drawing methods to make the selections.AB907,36Section 3. 565.27 (2) (b) 4. of the statutes is repealed.AB907,47Section 4. 565.27 (2) (b) 4m. of the statutes is created to read:AB907,2,118565.27 (2) (b) 4m. At least annually, for any drawings conducted, the 9department shall contract with an independent firm to perform an audit of the 10drawing processes and review technologies employed by the department, security 11procedures, computer and systems security, and randomly selected drawings.AB907,2,1212